District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5723

Separation of fraternal and insurance activities — Certificate of corporation to be filed; contents.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 12, 1930, 46 Stat. 158, ch. 135, § 2
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(c), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1223.
1973 Ed., § 35-923.

Editor's Notes

This section was also amended by D.C. Law 12-81 to validate previously made technical corrections.

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5702.